fr: AB Agriculture Biologique, AB, Agence Bio, ab bio, bio ab, Ab-certifie-agriculture-biologique, ab certifié, AB France
xx: AB Agriculture Biologique

en: Catalan Council of Organic Production, CCPAE
ca: Consell Català de la Producció Agrària Ecològica, CCPAE
es: Consejo Catalán de la Producción Agraria Ecológica, CCPAE

en: AT-BIO-004
xx: AT-BIO-004

en: AT-BIO-301
xx: AT-BIO-301

en: AT-BIO-302
xx: AT-BIO-302

en: AT-BIO-401
xx: AT-BIO-401

en: AT-BIO-402
xx: AT-BIO-402

en: AT-BIO-501
xx: AT-BIO-501

en: AT-BIO-701
xx: AT-BIO-701

en: AT-BIO-901
xx: AT-BIO-901

en: AT-BIO-902
xx: AT-BIO-902

en: BE-BIO-01, Certisys BE-BIO-01
xx: BE-BIO-01, Certisys BE-BIO-01

en: BE-BIO-02
xx: BE-BIO-02

en: BE-BIO-03
xx: BE-BIO-03

en: BE-BIO-04
xx: BE-BIO-04

en: BG-BIO-02
xx: BG-BIO-02

en: BG-BIO-03
xx: BG-BIO-03

en: BG-BIO-04
xx: BG-BIO-04

en: BG-BIO-05
xx: BG-BIO-05

en: BG-BIO-06
xx: BG-BIO-06